Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 3. Funding Local Correctional Facilities and Programs.

§ 53.1-80.
State reimbursement of localities for construction.

On and after July 1, 1993, the Commonwealth shall reimburse any city or county up to one-fourth of the capital costs of a jail construction, enlargement or renovation project upon a basis approved by the Board in accordance with the provisions of this section. On and after July 1, 1993, (i) any three or more cities or counties, or any combination thereof, which do not qualify for reimbursement pursuant to §

53.1-81

or §

53.1-82

and (ii) any two cities or counties or any combination of a city and a county which jointly construct, enlarge or renovate a jail upon a basis approved by the Board in accordance with the provisions of this section shall be reimbursed by the Commonwealth on a pro rata basis up to one-fourth of the capital costs, as defined in §

53.1-82.2

, of such project. The Board shall promulgate regulations, to include criteria which may be used to assess need and establish priorities, to serve as guidelines in evaluating requests for such reimbursement and to ensure the fair and equitable distribution of state funds provided for such purpose. The Department shall apply such regulations in preparing requests for appropriations. No such reimbursement shall be had unless the plans and specifications, including the need for additional personnel, thereof have been submitted to the Governor and the jail project has been approved by him. The Governor shall base his approval in part on the expected operating cost-efficiency of the interior design of the facility. Reimbursements shall be paid subject to the provisions of §

53.1-82.2

.No (i) project to construct, enlarge, or renovate a jail or regional jail facility or to enlarge or renovate an existing jail that was not approved by the Governor prior to July 1, 2015, or (ii) project that is not an enlargement or renovation of a regional jail created prior to July 1, 2015, shall be eligible for reimbursement from the Commonwealth unless such project has been specifically authorized in the general appropriation act.

In the event that a county or city requests and receives financial assistance for capital costs of such jail project from the Department of Criminal Justice Services or from other public fund sources outside of the provisions of this law, the total financial assistance and reimbursement shall not exceed the total cost of the project.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-133.1; 1968, c. 304; 1970, cc. 252, 373; 1973, c. 233; 1981, c. 380; 1982, c. 636; 1983, c. 358; 1989, c. 423; 1993, cc. 387, 787; 1995, c. 305; 2015, c. 749.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1989, c. 423, cl. 2 provides that reimbursement for jail construction, renovation or enlargement projects which were approved by the Board of Corrections and for which appropriation of state funds for reimbursement was specifically authorized prior to Dec. 1, 1989, shall be governed by the law as it existed prior to Dec. 1, 1989.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 749 added the second paragraph of subsection A.

§ 53.1-81.
Construction and operation of regional jail facilities; state reimbursement; agreements with Department.

Three or more cities or counties, or any combination thereof, are authorized, pursuant to approval of the Board, to construct, enlarge or renovate a regional jail facility or to enlarge or renovate an existing jail for the purpose of establishing a regional jail facility. In addition, (i) any regional jail facilities established by three or more cities, counties or towns, or any combination thereof, on or before January 31, 1993, (ii) any existing regional jail facilities established by only two cities, counties or towns on or before June 30, 1982, and (iii) any regional jail facilities established by only two contiguous counties whose boundaries are not contiguous by land with the boundaries of any other county in the Commonwealth, may participate under the provisions of this section. On and after December 1, 1989, subject to the provisions of §

53.1-82.2

, the Commonwealth shall reimburse each such locality its pro rata share up to one-half of the capital costs, as defined in §

53.1-82.2

, of such construction, enlargement or renovation in accordance with the provisions of this section if the project was approved by the Governor prior to July 1, 2015, or the project is an enlargement or renovation of a regional jail facility created prior to July 1, 2015, and shall reimburse each such locality its pro rata share up to one-fourth of such capital costs if such project is approved by the Governor on or after July 1, 2015, and has been specifically authorized in the general appropriation act. On or after July 1, 2017, subject to the provisions of § 53.1-82.2, the Commonwealth shall reimburse each such locality its pro rata share up to one-fourth of the capital costs, as defined in § 53.1-82.2, for any construction, enlargement or renovation project in accordance with the provisions of this section if such project is approved by the Governor on or after July 1, 2017, and has been specifically authorized in the general appropriation act. However, regional jails created by any combination of three or more cities or counties on or after February 1, 1993, shall not be eligible for such reimbursement unless at least three of the participating localities of such combination were each operating a jail on February 1, 1993. The Board shall promulgate regulations, to include criteria which may be used to assess need and establish priorities, to serve as guidelines in evaluating requests for such reimbursement and to ensure the fair and equitable distribution of state funds provided for such purpose. The Department shall apply such regulations in preparing requests for appropriations. No such reimbursement shall be had unless the plans and specifications, including the need for additional personnel, thereof have been submitted to the Governor and the jail project has been approved by him. The Governor shall base his approval in part on the expected operating cost-efficiency of the interior design of the facility. Such reimbursement shall be paid subject to the provisions of § 53.1-82.2.Such counties, cities, towns, or combination thereof may enter into agreements with the Department of Corrections for the Department to operate such jail or to pay the costs of maintenance, upkeep and other operational costs of the jail. Each city, county or town shall, however, bear the expense of local prisoners from such city, county or town. In such case, the Department shall receive such costs from the funds appropriated in the general appropriation act for criminal costs. The method of operation by the Department shall be in the manner it prescribes, notwithstanding any other provision of law designating sheriffs as the keepers of jails.In lieu of an agreement by the localities with the Board for construction or operation of jail facilities, the Board may agree to sell land owned by the Commonwealth to the localities. The Governor is hereby authorized, at his discretion and upon the advice of the Board, to execute a conveyance of such land in a form approved by the Attorney General.

In the event that a county, city or town requests and receives financial assistance for capital costs of such jail project from the Department of Criminal Justice Services or from other public fund sources outside of the provisions of this section, the total financial assistance and reimbursement shall not exceed the total cost of the project.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-133.2; 1970, c. 419; 1972, c. 573; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1981, c. 380; 1982, c. 636; 1983, c. 358; 1989, c. 423; 1993, cc. 387, 787; 1995, c. 305; 2015, c. 749; 2017, c. 211.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1989, c. 423, cl. 2 provides that reimbursement for jail construction, renovation or enlargement projects which were approved by the Board of Corrections and for which appropriation of state funds for reimbursement was specifically authorized prior to Dec. 1, 1989, shall be governed by the law as it existed prior to Dec. 1, 1989.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 749 inserted “if the project was approved by the Governor prior to July 1, 2015, or the project is an enlargement or renovation of a regional jail facility created prior to July 1, 2015, and shall reimburse each such locality its pro rata share up to one-fourth of such capital costs if such project is approved by the Governor on or after July 1, 2015, and has been specifically authorized in the general appropriation act” in the third sentence of subsection A.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 211 added the fourth sentence in subsection A.

§ 53.1-82.
Regional contracts for cooperative jailing of offenders; state reimbursement.

Three or more counties or cities, or any combination thereof, are authorized to contract for services for the detention and confinement of categories of offenders in single or regional jail facilities operated by the contracting jurisdictions. In addition, (i) any three or more counties, cities or towns, or any combination thereof, operating a jail facility pursuant to an agreement for cooperative jailing established on or before January 31, 1993, (ii) any existing regional jail facilities established by only two cities, counties, or towns on or before June 30, 1982, and (iii) any regional jail facilities established by only two contiguous counties whose boundaries are not contiguous by land with the boundaries of any other county in the Commonwealth, may participate under the provisions of this section. The Board shall promulgate regulations specifying the categories of offenders which may be served pursuant to the contracts provided for herein.The governing bodies of localities participating in an agreement for cooperative jailing shall create a board to advise the locality in which the jail facility is located on matters affecting operation of the facility. Each participating locality shall have at least one representative on the board. The sheriff and any member of the local governing body of each participating locality shall be eligible for appointment to the board; however, when a participating locality appoints more than one representative, the sheriff shall be appointed unless the sheriff is the administrator or superintendent of the jail facility operated pursuant to the agreement for cooperative jailing. A sheriff serving as such administrator or superintendent shall be an ex officio member of the board.When such contracts are approved by the Board and, for the implementation of the contract, require the construction, enlargement, or renovation of a regional jail facility or the enlargement or renovation of an existing jail, the Commonwealth shall reimburse each such locality its pro rata share, up to one-half, of the capital costs, as defined in §

53.1-82.2

, of such jail project in accordance with the provisions of this section and §

53.1-82.2

if the project was approved by the Governor prior to July 1, 2015, or the project is an enlargement or renovation of a regional jail facility created prior to July 1, 2015, and shall reimburse each such locality its pro rata share up to one-fourth of such capital costs if such project is approved by the Governor on or after July 1, 2015, and has been specifically authorized in the general appropriation act. On or after July 1, 2017, subject to the provisions of §

53.1-82.2

, the Commonwealth shall reimburse each such locality its pro rata share up to one-fourth of the capital costs, as defined in § 53.1-82.2, for any construction, enlargement or renovation project in accordance with the provisions of this section if such project is approved by the Governor on or after July 1, 2017, and has been specifically authorized in the general appropriation act. Any agreement for cooperative jailing entered into on or after July 1, 1991, which requires the construction, enlargement, or renovation of a single or regional jail facility shall require such counties, cities and towns to participate in the costs of the facility for a minimum period of thirty years.The Board shall promulgate regulations, to include criteria which may be used to assess need and establish priorities, to serve as guidelines in evaluating requests for such reimbursement and to ensure the fair and equitable distribution of state funds provided for such purpose. The Department shall apply such regulations in preparing requests for appropriations. No such reimbursement shall be had unless the plans and specifications, including the need for additional personnel, thereof have been submitted to the Governor, and the jail project has been approved by him. The Governor shall base his approval in part on the expected operating cost-efficiency of the interior design of the facility. Such reimbursement shall be paid subject to the provisions of § 53.1-82.2.

In the event that a county, city or town requests and receives financial assistance for capital costs of a jail project from the Department of Criminal Justice Services or from other public fund sources outside of the provisions of this section, the total financial assistance and reimbursement shall not exceed the total cost of the project.In addition, no such reimbursement shall be had by localities entering into a contract pursuant to this section on or after February 1, 1993, unless at least three of the participating localities were each operating a jail on February 1, 1993.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-133.3; 1981, c. 380; 1982, c. 636; 1983, c. 358; 1989, c. 423; 1991, c. 453; 1993, cc. 387, 787; 1995, c. 305; 2015, c. 749; 2017, c. 211.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1989, c. 423, cl. 2 provides that reimbursement for jail construction, renovation or enlargement projects which were approved by the Board of Corrections and for which appropriation of state funds for reimbursement was specifically authorized prior to Dec. 1, 1989, shall be governed by the law as it existed prior to Dec. 1, 1989.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 749 added “if the project was approved by the Governor prior to July 1, 2015, or the project is an enlargement or renovation of a regional jail facility created prior to July 1, 2015, and shall reimburse each such locality its pro rata share up to one-fourth of such capital costs if such project is approved by the Governor on or after July 1, 2015, and has been specifically authorized in the general appropriation act” in the first sentence of the third paragraph of subsection A.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 211 added the second sentence in the third paragraph of subsection A.

§ 53.1-82.1.
Approval of jail projects by the Board; plan for community corrections.

The Board shall promulgate regulations requiring localities seeking approval of a jail project to (i) submit a community-based corrections plan and (ii) demonstrate that the project can be completed and operated in a cost-efficient manner. Such regulations shall require, at a minimum, the following:

That the request include an analysis of staffing needs and a six-year operating budget for the proposed facility;

That the request include a plan for development and implementation of pre-trial detention alternatives and post-disposition punishment alternatives on a systematic local and regional basis, which plan shall be reviewed, modified and approved by the Board with assistance from the Department of Criminal Justice Services; and

That the project be based on a locality- or region-specific jail population forecast, which shall include an analysis of the impact on the jail population of the alternatives identified pursuant to subdivision 2 of this section, and which forecast shall be reviewed by the Department of Criminal Justice Services.The Board shall approve no proposed jail project which does not conform to the regulations promulgated pursuant to this section.The provisions of this section shall not apply to jail renovation projects which do not result in a net increase in available bed space.

History.

1993, cc. 387, 787; 2000, c. 1040.

Cross references.

As to establishment of a system of community-based services pursuant to the Comprehensive Community Corrections Act for Local-Responsible Offenders, see §

9.1-174

.

As to responsibility of community criminal justice boards, see §

9.1-180

.

As to pretrial services agencies, see §

19.2-152.2

.

§ 53.1-82.2.
Method of reimbursement; involvement of the Treasury Board.

Reimbursements by the Commonwealth to localities or regional jail authorities for a portion of the capital costs of a jail project, made pursuant to §§

53.1-80

,

53.1-81

,

53.1-82

, or §

53.1-95.19

may be effected by one of the following methods:

In one lump sum payment to be made upon completion of the project, for minor renovation projects, or two equal lump sum payments, one such payment to be made upon certification that the construction, enlargement or renovation is fifty percent complete and the second such payment to be made upon completion of the project, such payments to be paid by the State Treasurer out of funds appropriated to the Department of Corrections;

Over a specified period of time through a contractual agreement entered into by the Treasury Board and approved by the Governor, on behalf of the Commonwealth, and the locality, localities or regional authority or other combination of localities undertaking a jail project, such payments to be paid by the State Treasurer out of funds appropriated to the Treasury Board; or

In one lump sum payment to be made upon completion of the project by the Virginia Public Building Authority pursuant to §

2.2-2263

, including the Commonwealth’s share of the interest costs expended by the locality or regional jail authority for financing such project during the period from fifty percent completion of construction to final completion of construction.

The General Assembly shall have the sole authority to determine whether reimbursement will be made pursuant to subdivision A 1, A 2, or A 3. The Department of Planning and Budget, after consulting with the Treasury Board, shall evaluate all proposed jail projects and make recommendations to the Governor regarding the method of reimbursement for inclusion in his biennial budget.

Any contract for reimbursement over a specified period of time entered into pursuant to subdivision A 2 shall include the following:

The Commonwealth shall reimburse a portion of financing costs as provided in subsection E below;

The Commonwealth’s reimbursement payments shall be subject to appropriation;

In the event that the jail project is financed through an issuance of securities, the Commonwealth’s reimbursement payments shall be calculated using the coupon interest rates received by the locality or jail authority at the time the securities for the project are sold and shall be made pursuant to a schedule to be set forth in the contract;

In the event that a jail project is financed through an issuance of securities, and coupon interest rates are not available due to the structure of the securities, the Treasury Board is authorized to make such adjustments as are necessary and reasonable to calculate the Commonwealth’s payments;

In the event that the jail project is financed through a method other than the issuance of securities, the Commonwealth’s payment shall include interest payments based on an interest rate assumption equal to the prevailing AA rate for tax-exempt bonds issued by the Commonwealth or agencies thereof, or the actual rate achieved, whichever is lower, and the schedule for the Commonwealth’s reimbursement payments shall be set forth in the contract; and

Such other terms and conditions as are necessary to specify the structure of the Commonwealth’s participation in project financing and as may be required by guidelines established by the Treasury Board.Reimbursement to localities pursuant to this section shall be available without regard to the security level of the facility constructed, enlarged or renovated, provided such facility satisfies applicable standards established by the Board pursuant to §

53.1-68

.

For purposes of this article, “capital costs” includes, but is not limited to, actual construction costs, costs of land acquisition, if the land purchased is used exclusively for siting a jail facility, architectural and engineering fees, and fixed equipment. “Capital costs” does not include administrative costs nor a financial advisor’s, an investment banker’s, or attorneys’ fees incurred by local governments or, except in the case of minimum security facilities, loose equipment or furnishings.

For purposes of this article, “financing costs” means the total of all costs incurred by the locality, localities or regional authority or other combination of localities as are deemed reasonable and necessary by the Treasury Board to execute the financing of the Commonwealth’s payment of capital costs and to fund such funds and accounts as the Treasury Board determines to be reasonable and necessary.

History.

1993, cc. 387, 787; 1995, c. 305; 1996, c. 835.

§ 53.1-82.3.
Budgeting schedule for jail projects.

Any city or county or any combination of cities or counties requesting state financial assistance pursuant to §§

53.1-80

,

53.1-81

or §

53.1-82

shall, on or before March 1 biennially in the odd-numbered years, submit to the Governor, in a format prescribed by the Department of Corrections for such purpose, a community-based corrections plan and specifications, including detailed cost estimates of any facility construction. On or before July 1 in the odd-numbered years, such localities shall also submit to the Governor, in a format prescribed for such purpose by the Department of the Treasury, the expected financing costs for any such facility construction in accordance with §

53.1-82.2

. The Governor shall submit his recommendations for funding such projects as part of the budget bill on or before December 20 of the year immediately prior to the beginning of each regular session held in an even-numbered year of the General Assembly. Requests for appropriations of such funds shall be considered by the General Assembly only in even-numbered years.

In the event that the state share of reimbursable costs of the jail facility is estimated to be less than or equal to $1,000,000, such localities shall be exempt from submitting to the Governor, in a format prescribed for such purpose by the Department of the Treasury, the expected financing costs for any such facility construction in accordance with subsection A above, unless such localities seek reimbursement of financial costs associated with such facility construction.

History.

1993, cc. 387, 787; 1995, c. 305; 1998, cc. 498, 504; 2000, c. 1040.

The 1998 amendments.

The 1998 amendments by cc. 498 and 504 are identical, and in subsections A and B, substituted “Department of the Treasury” for “Treasury Board.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 1040 substituted “a community-based corrections plan” for “community corrections plans” in the first sentence of subsection A.

§ 53.1-83.
Repealed by Acts 1993, cc. 387 and 787.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to reimbursement for the construction of a jail, see §

53.1-82.2

.

§ 53.1-83.1.
How state appropriations for operating costs of local correctional facilities determined.

The Governor’s proposed biennial budget bill shall include, for each fiscal year, an appropriation for operating costs for local correctional facilities.
The proposed appropriation shall include:

An amount for compensating localities for the cost of maintaining prisoners arrested on state warrants in local jails, regional jails and jail farms, at a specified rate per prisoner day;

An amount for maintaining convicted state felons in local correctional facilities, at a specified rate per felon day, pursuant to §

53.1-20.1

;

An amount to pay two-thirds of the salaries of medical and treatment personnel approved by the State Compensation Board; and

An amount to be set aside for unanticipated medical emergencies.

History.

1983, c. 358; 1992, cc. 333, 573.

§ 53.1-84.
State funds available to local correctional facilities for operating costs.

The Compensation Board shall apportion among local correctional facilities moneys appropriated in the general appropriation act for the purpose of financial assistance for the confinement of persons in local facilities in accordance with reports of prisoner days provided by the Department.

The county or city receiving such funds or a combination of counties or cities or both receiving such funds on behalf of a regional facility shall pay therefrom the operating costs of its local adult correctional facilities and programs. Criminal costs prior to confinement shall be paid out of funds appropriated pursuant to §

19.2-332

.

Regulations adopted by the Board to implement the provisions of §§

53.1-84

through

53.1-86

shall not be subject to legislative review as provided in §

2.2-4014

. In the adoption of such regulations, the Board shall comply with all other requirements of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.), and in any subsequent amendments thereto shall comply with all the provisions of §

2.2-4012

.

History.

1982, c. 636; 1983, c. 358.

§ 53.1-85.
Time and manner of payment.

Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of this Code which provide for state reimbursement of certain costs incurred by local correctional facilities, the time and manner of such payments shall be as hereinafter prescribed.

Each facility’s apportionment pursuant to §

53.1-84

shall be paid by the Compensation Board to the responsible local governing body or fiscal agent of such facility in quarterly installments beginning July, 1983.

The amount of the quarterly installment for each facility will be the sum of the following:

The number of state prisoner days registered by the facility in the preceding quarter, pursuant to §

53.1-121

, times the specified rate per prisoner day;

The number of prisoner days registered for convicted state felons by the facility in the preceding quarter times the specified rate per felon day, pursuant to §

53.1-20.1

; and

One-fourth of the annual cost for salaries and fringe benefits for medical and treatment personnel approved by the Compensation Board pursuant to §

15.2-1636.7

.

Funds held in the emergency reserve shall be distributed on the written authorization of the Compensation Board. In the event of emergencies, the Compensation Board may reallocate any portion of the reserve among individual facilities. Any balance remaining in the reserve at the close of the budgetary period shall revert to the general fund of the state treasury.

History.

1982, c. 636; 1983, c. 358; 1992, cc. 333, 573.

§ 53.1-86.
Limitation on use of state funds; records of receipts and disbursements.

No locality receiving state funds under §

53.1-85

shall use such funds for any purpose other than for paying expenses incurred as the result of the confinement of persons in local correctional facilities. The Department shall require a locality to return any portion of state funds expended in violation of this provision to the state treasury. Should an unexpended balance of state funds exist at the end of the apportionment year, the unencumbered funds in such balance may be reverted to the local treasury and subsequently shall be expended for operating expenses of local correctional facilities. In the case of regional correctional facilities, the unexpended balance of state funds shall be apportioned by the regional facility’s governing body to the participating localities based on the number of prisoner days of persons confined in the facility from each jurisdiction.

Each locality shall keep records of receipts and disbursements of state funds received pursuant to §

53.1-85

. Such records shall be open for evaluation by the Department and audit by the Auditor of Public Accounts.

History.

1982, c. 636.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

The use of state funds appropriated for a local correctional facility

is limited by this section to the payment of expenses incurred for persons confined in the correctional facility. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable J. T. “Tommy” Whitt, Sheriff for Montgomery County, 04-075 (10/19/04).

Surplus funds, if any, may be returned to the local treasury

to be used for such operating expenses, and any excess funds not so used must be returned to the state treasury. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable J. T. “Tommy” Whitt, Sheriff for Montgomery County, 04-075 (10/19/04).

§ 53.1-87.
Cost of maintenance of jails; payment by localities of respective shares of costs; judicial resolution of disagreements.

In any instance in which a local correctional facility of a county, city or town is designated by the Board as the place where prisoners committed by the courts or other authorities of any other county, city or town shall be confined, any capital outlay expenses incurred for necessary repairs, improvements or additions to such facility, and all costs of maintenance of the facility chargeable to the localities, shall be borne ratably by the several counties, cities or towns using it.

The share of each respective county, city or town involved in such costs shall be such proportion of the total cost of such repairs, improvements, additions and other such costs as the total aggregate number of days spent in local correctional facilities by prisoners committed by the courts or other authorities of such county, city or town, for the five-year period next preceding the year in which such repairs, improvements or additions are begun, or other costs incurred, bears to the total aggregate number of days spent in local correctional facilities by the prisoners committed by the courts or other authorities of both or all of the counties, cities and towns using the facility to which such repairs, improvements or additions are made or in which such other costs are incurred. The amount to be paid by each county, city or town involved shall be determined by the Board on the basis herein set forth.

The Board shall furnish a statement of the several shares of the cost so determined to the governing body of each county, city and town involved, and the respective shares shall be paid within thirty days from the date upon which such statement is furnished. If the costs of any such repairs, improvements or additions will not exceed $2000 they may be authorized by the governing body of the county, city or town to whose correctional facility such repairs, improvements or additions are to be made. If the costs will exceed $2000, such repairs, improvements or additions shall be recommended by the Board and agreed on in advance by the governing bodies of both or all of the counties, cities and towns involved.In case of disagreement, the matter of the extent of the repairs, improvements or additions and the proportionate cost to the respective localities involved shall be determined by the circuit court of the locality which owns or maintains the correctional institution proposed to be repaired, improved or added to, upon the petition of the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-136; 1970, c. 648; 1982, c. 636.

§ 53.1-88.
Governing body to examine statements, accounts and invoices and issue warrants.

The governing body of each city or county or its duly authorized representative shall examine all statements of account and invoices laid before it by the sheriff pursuant to §§

53.1-126

and

53.1-133.5

. After satisfying itself that the statements and invoices are correct, the governing body shall cause warrants to be issued on the county or city treasurer, or other disbursing officer, for the payment of such accounts and invoices.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-178; 1982, c. 636; 1992, c. 859.

§ 53.1-89.
Repealed by Acts 1983, c. 358.

§ 53.1-90.
Pay for United States prisoners.

Each sheriff or jail superintendent shall collect from the United States, for prisoners of the United States confined in the jail of his county, city or region, such amounts as shall be agreed upon by the governing body of the county or city or, in the case of a regional jail, the regional jail authority or, if none, the body responsible for the fiscal management of the regional jails and the appropriate authorities of the Government of the United States, which amounts shall not be less than the actual cost of feeding, clothing, caring for and furnishing medicine and medical attention for such prisoners.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-181; 1982, c. 636; 1991, c. 383.

§ 53.1-91.
Pay for prisoners from other counties, cities or towns.

Each sheriff or jail superintendent shall collect from the counties, cities and towns of the Commonwealth, other than the county, city or region for which he is elected or appointed, and from any other state or country for which any prisoner is held in such jail, the reasonable costs of guarding, feeding, clothing, caring for and furnishing medicine and medical attention for prisoners held for such county, city, town, state or country, to be determined by agreement with the governmental unit involved, or, in the absence of such agreement, as shall be determined by the governing body of his county, city or regional jail.

The term “reasonable costs,” as used in this section, means an amount not to exceed actual costs, including depreciation, less such amounts as may be paid by the Commonwealth pursuant to §§

15.2-1609.8

and

53.1-85

.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-182; 1982, c. 636; 1983, c. 358; 1991, c. 383.

§ 53.1-92.
Disposition of money collected from United States or other counties, cities or towns.

All moneys so collected by such sheriff from the United States or from any such county, city, town, state or country shall be promptly paid into the treasury of his county or city.
The total amount so collected shall be retained by such county or city.
All moneys so collected by jail superintendents shall be promptly paid into the treasury of the regional jail authority or, if none, the body responsible for the fiscal management of the regional jail.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-183; 1982, c. 636; 1991, c. 383.

§ 53.1-93.
When sheriffs to summon or employ guards and other persons; allowances therefor; fees charged to prisoner.

Whenever in the discretion of the court it is necessary for the safekeeping of a prisoner under charge of or sentence for a crime, whether the prisoner be in jail, hospital, court or elsewhere, the court may order the sheriff to summon a sufficient guard. Whenever ordered by the court to do so, the sheriff shall summon or employ temporarily such persons as may be needed to preserve proper order or otherwise to aid the court in its proper operation and functioning. For such guard or other service the court may allow so much as it deems proper, not exceeding the hourly equivalent of the minimum annual salary paid a full-time deputy sheriff who performs like services in the same county or city. In addition, mileage and other expenses for rendering the services shall be paid for each such person. A prisoner may be charged reasonable fees for providing him a security escort, supervision and transportation to and from a funeral or graveside service.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 19-283, 19.1-308, 53-183.2; 1956, c. 687; 1960, c. 366; 1972, c. 145; 1973, c. 401; 1976, c. 286; 1981, c. 386; 1982, c. 636; 2002, c. 336.

§ 53.1-94.
Same when paid by county or city; same when by Compensation Board.

The circuit court, before certifying any allowance pursuant to §

53.1-93

, shall inquire into the condition of the jail. If it appears that a guard was necessary because of the insecurity of the jail, it shall order the allowance to be certified to the governing body of the county or city. If otherwise, and the guard was necessary, the allowance shall be paid out of the budget of the sheriff as approved by the Compensation Board.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 19-284, 19.1-309, 53-183.3; 1960, c. 366; 1972, c. 145; 1982, c. 636; 1985, c. 321.

§ 53.1-95.
Provisions applicable to jail farms of counties and cities.

When the control, management and supervision of the jail farm of any county or city is not vested in the sheriff of such county or city, such county or city shall be paid out of state funds pursuant to §

53.1-85

for the care and custody at such jail farm of persons accused or convicted of any offense against the laws of the Commonwealth, and witnesses held in cases to which the Commonwealth is a party. Such payments shall include only the reasonable cost of guarding, and providing necessary housing, maintenance, administrative expenses, food, clothing, medicine and medical attention for such prisoners.

A1.

Such county or city may also collect from other counties, cities or towns of the Commonwealth for which any prisoner is held at the jail farm of such county or city the reasonable cost of feeding, clothing, caring for and furnishing medicine and medical attention for such prisoner, and maintenance and administrative costs of the facility on a per prisoner basis. As used in this section, the term “reasonable cost” means an amount not to exceed actual costs, including depreciation, less such amounts as may be paid by the Commonwealth pursuant to §§

15.2-1609.8

and

53.1-85

.

When the control, management and supervision of the jail farm of any county or city is not vested in the sheriff of such county or city, the county or city may collect from the United States, for prisoners of the United States at the jail farm, such amounts as may be agreed upon by the county or city and the appropriate authorities of the Government of the United States, which amounts shall not be less than the actual cost of feeding, clothing and caring for such prisoners. Such county or city may collect from any state, other than this Commonwealth, and from any country other than the United States, for which any prisoner is held at the jail farm of such county or city, the cost of guarding, and providing necessary food, clothing, medicine and medical attention for prisoners held for such other state or country. The amount thereof shall be agreed upon by the governmental units involved.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-188; 1960, c. 411; 1982, c. 636; 1983, c. 358.

§ 53.1-95.1.
Limits on state expenditures.

The Governor may withhold approval for state expenditures, by reimbursement or otherwise, for the purposes set out in this article as provided in the current general appropriation act.

History.

1986, c. 394.